Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Dissolution — Legal Separation

403.140.
Marriage — Court may enter decree of dissolution or separation.

The Circuit Court shall enter a decree of dissolution of marriage if:

The court finds that one (1) of the parties, at the time the action was commenced, resided in this state, or was stationed in this state while a member of the armed services, and that the residence or military presence has been maintained for 180 days next preceding the filing of the petition;

The court finds that the conciliation provisions of KRS

403.170

either do not apply or have been met;

The court finds that the marriage is irretrievably broken; and

To the extent it has jurisdiction to do so, the court has considered, approved or made provision for child custody, the support of any child of the marriage entitled to support, the maintenance of either spouse, and the disposition of property.

If a party requests a decree of legal separation rather than a decree of dissolution of marriage, the court shall grant the decree in that form unless the other party objects, in which latter event the other provisions of this chapter shall apply.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 4.

403.150.
Procedure — Commencement of action, pleadings, abolition of existing defenses.

All proceedings under this chapter are commenced in the manner provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure.

The verified petition in a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation shall allege the marriage is irretrievably broken and shall set forth:

The age, occupation, Social Security number, and residence of each party, provided in accordance with KRS

403.135

, and his length of residence in this state. If domestic violence and abuse, as defined in KRS

403.720

, is alleged by either party, the party filing the petition shall certify the existence and status of any domestic violence protective orders. The party filing the petition and alleging the abuse may substitute the party’s attorney’s address as the address of the party and any minor children;

The date of the marriage and the place at which it was registered;

That the parties are separated and the date on which the parties separated;

The names, ages, Social Security numbers, and addresses, provided in accordance with KRS

403.135

, of any living infant children of the marriage, and whether the wife is pregnant;

Any arrangements as to custody, visitation, and support of the children and the maintenance of a spouse; and

The relief sought.

Either or both parties to the marriage may initiate the proceeding.

If a proceeding is commenced by one (1) of the parties, the other party must be served in the manner provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure and may file a verified response.

Previously existing defenses to divorce and legal separation, including but not limited to condonation, connivance, collusion, recrimination, insanity, and lapse of time, are abolished.

The court may join additional parties proper for the exercise of its authority to implement this chapter.

When the wife is pregnant at the time the petition is filed, the court may continue the case until the pregnancy is terminated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 5; 1992, ch. 169, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 255, § 17, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 126, § 2, effective July 12, 2006.

403.160.
Temporary orders — Maintenance, child support, injunction — Disclosure of information on domestic violence or child abuse.

In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or for legal separation, or in a proceeding for disposition of property or for maintenance or support following dissolution of the marriage by a court which lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse, either party may move for temporary maintenance. The motion shall be accompanied by an affidavit setting forth the factual basis for the motion and the amounts requested.

In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or child support, either party, with notice to the opposing party, may move for temporary child support. The motion shall be accompanied by an affidavit setting forth the number of children of the marriage and the information required to calculate the combined adjusted parental gross income set forth in KRS

403.212

, and the Social Security numbers, provided in accordance with KRS

403.135

, of all parties subject to the motion. The court shall, within fourteen (14) days from the filing of said motion, order an amount of temporary child support based upon the child support guidelines as provided by law, and the ordered child support shall be retroactive to the date of the filing of the motion unless otherwise ordered by the court.

Upon a showing of good cause, either party may move the court to enter an order for temporary child support without written or oral notice to the adverse party. After reviewing the affidavit required by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the court may issue a temporary child support order based upon the child support guidelines. The order shall provide that the order becomes effective seven (7) days following service of the order and movant’s affidavit upon the adverse party unless the adverse party, within the seven (7) day period, files a motion for a hearing before the court. The motion for hearing shall be accompanied by the affidavit required by paragraph (a) of this subsection. Pending the hearing, the adverse party shall pay child support in an amount based upon the guidelines and the adverse party’s affidavit. The child support order entered following the hearing shall be retroactive to the date of the filing of the motion for temporary support unless otherwise ordered by the court.

As part of a motion for temporary maintenance or support or by independent motion accompanied by affidavit, either party may request the court to issue a temporary injunction or restraining order pursuant to the Rules of Civil Procedure.

If the court or agent of the court is made aware that there is reasonable evidence of domestic violence or child abuse, the court shall determine whether disclosure to any other person of the information could be harmful to the parent or child, and if the court determines that disclosure to any person could be harmful, the court and its agents shall not make the disclosure.

On the basis of the showing made and in conformity with KRS

403.200

, the court may issue a temporary injunction or restraining order and an order for temporary maintenance in amounts and on terms just and proper in the circumstances.

A temporary order or temporary injunction:

Does not prejudice the rights of the parties or the child which are to be adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding;

May be revoked or modified before final decree on a showing of the facts necessary to revocation or modification under the circumstances; and

Terminates when the final decree is entered or when the petition for dissolution or legal separation is voluntarily dismissed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 6; 1990, ch. 418, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 330, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 365, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 255, § 18, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 430, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 126, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2021 ch. 47, § 6, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 122, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2000). Although House Committee Amendment 1 (adopted by the House of Representatives and concurred in by the Senate) to the General Assembly version of Senate Bill 218 eliminated a new paragraph (c) in KRS 403.212(2) that had required a conforming amendment to this statute to change a cross-reference from “KRS 403.212(2)(g)” to “KRS 403.212(2)(h)” in subsection (2)(a) of this statute, the conforming amendment was not corrected in the floor amendment. Because of this omission and because of the context of the cross-reference, the change in subsection (2)(a) of this statute constitutes a manifest clerical or typographical error and has not been included in codification. See KRS 7.136(1)(h).

403.170.
Marriage — Irretrievable breakdown.

If both of the parties by petition or otherwise have stated under oath or affirmation that the marriage is irretrievably broken, or one of the parties has so stated and the other has not denied it, the court, after hearing, shall make a finding whether the marriage is irretrievably broken. No decree shall be entered until the parties have lived apart for 60 days. Living apart shall include living under the same roof without sexual cohabitation. The court may order a conciliation conference as a part of the hearing.

If one of the parties has denied under oath or affirmation that the marriage is irretrievably broken, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including the circumstances that gave rise to filing the petition and the prospect of reconciliation, and shall:

Make a finding whether the marriage is irretrievably broken; or

Continue the matter for further hearing not fewer than 30 nor more than 60 days later, or as soon thereafter as the matter may be reached on the court’s calendar, and may suggest to the parties that they seek counseling.

The court, at the request of either party shall, or on its own motion may, order a conciliation conference. At the adjourned hearing the court shall make a finding whether the marriage is irretrievably broken.

A finding of irretrievable breakdown is a determination that there is no reasonable prospect of reconciliation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 7; 1978, ch. 236, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

403.180.
Separation agreement — Court may find unconscionable.

To promote amicable settlement of disputes between parties to a marriage attendant upon their separation or the dissolution of their marriage, the parties may enter into a written separation agreement containing provisions for maintenance of either of them, disposition of any property owned by either of them, and custody, support and visitation of their children.

In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or for legal separation, the terms of the separation agreement, except those providing for the custody, support, and visitation of children, are binding upon the court unless it finds, after considering the economic circumstances of the parties and any other relevant evidence produced by the parties, on their own motion or on request of the court, that the separation agreement is unconscionable.

If the court finds the separation agreement unconscionable, it may request the parties to submit a revised separation agreement or may make orders for the disposition of property, support, and maintenance.

If the court finds that the separation agreement is not unconscionable as to support, maintenance, and property:

Unless the separation agreement provides to the contrary, its terms shall be set forth verbatim or incorporated by reference in the decree of dissolution or legal separation and the parties shall be ordered to perform them; or

If the separation agreement provides that its terms shall not be set forth in the decree, the decree shall identify the separation agreement and state that the court has found the terms not unconscionable.

Terms of the agreement set forth in the decree are enforceable by all remedies available for enforcement of a judgment, including contempt, and are enforceable as contract terms.

Except for terms concerning the support, custody, or visitation of children, the decree may expressly preclude or limit modification of terms if the separation agreement so provides. Otherwise, terms of a separation agreement are automatically modified by modification of the decree.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 8.

403.190.
Disposition of property.

In a proceeding for dissolution of the marriage or for legal separation, or in a proceeding for disposition of property following dissolution of the marriage by a court which lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse or lacked jurisdiction to dispose of the property, the court shall assign each spouse’s property to him. It also shall divide the marital property without regard to marital misconduct in just proportions considering all relevant factors including:

Contribution of each spouse to acquisition of the marital property, including contribution of a spouse as homemaker;

Value of the property set apart to each spouse;

Duration of the marriage; and

Economic circumstances of each spouse when the division of property is to become effective, including the desirability of awarding the family home or the right to live therein for reasonable periods to the spouse having custody of any children.

For the purpose of this chapter, “marital property” means all property acquired by either spouse subsequent to the marriage except:

Property acquired by gift, bequest, devise, or descent during the marriage and the income derived therefrom unless there are significant activities of either spouse which contributed to the increase in value of said property and the income earned therefrom;

Property acquired in exchange for property acquired before the marriage or in exchange for property acquired by gift, bequest, devise, or descent;

Property acquired by a spouse after a decree of legal separation;

Property excluded by valid agreement of the parties; and

The increase in value of property acquired before the marriage to the extent that such increase did not result from the efforts of the parties during marriage.

All property acquired by either spouse after the marriage and before a decree of legal separation is presumed to be marital property, regardless of whether title is held individually or by the spouses in some form of co-ownership such as joint tenancy, tenancy in common, tenancy by the entirety, and community property. The presumption of marital property is overcome by a showing that the property was acquired by a method listed in subsection (2) of this section.

If the retirement benefits of one spouse are excepted from classification as marital property, or not considered as an economic circumstance during the division of marital property, then the retirement benefits of the other spouse shall also be excepted, or not considered, as the case may be. However, the level of exception provided to the spouse with the greater retirement benefit shall not exceed the level of exception provided to the other spouse. Retirement benefits, for the purposes of this subsection shall include retirement or disability allowances, accumulated contributions, or any other benefit of a retirement system or plan regulated by the Employees Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or of a public retirement system administered by an agency of a state or local government, including deferred compensation plans created pursuant to KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

or defined contribution or money purchase plans qualified under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 9; 1986, ch. 441, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 328, §§ 1, 2, effective July 15, 1996.

403.200.
Maintenance — Court may grant order for either spouse.

In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation, or a proceeding for maintenance following dissolution of a marriage by a court which lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse, the court may grant a maintenance order for either spouse only if it finds that the spouse seeking maintenance:

Lacks sufficient property, including marital property apportioned to him, to provide for his reasonable needs; and

Is unable to support himself through appropriate employment or is the custodian of a child whose condition or circumstances make it appropriate that the custodian not be required to seek employment outside the home.

The maintenance order shall be in such amounts and for such periods of time as the court deems just, and after considering all relevant factors including:

The financial resources of the party seeking maintenance, including marital property apportioned to him, and his ability to meet his needs independently, including the extent to which a provision for support of a child living with the party includes a sum for that party as custodian;

The time necessary to acquire sufficient education or training to enable the party seeking maintenance to find appropriate employment;

The standard of living established during the marriage;

The duration of the marriage;

The age, and the physical and emotional condition of the spouse seeking maintenance; and

The ability of the spouse from whom maintenance is sought to meet his needs while meeting those of the spouse seeking maintenance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 10.

403.210.
Recognition of “Family Support Act of 1988” mandate.

The General Assembly recognizes that under the federal “Family Support Act of 1988,” P.L. 100-485, the Commonwealth of Kentucky is required to implement child support guidelines.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, §
11; 1988, ch. 258, §
7, effective July 15, 1988; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 418, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

403.211.
Action to establish or enforce child support — Rebuttable presumption for award — Allocation of child-care costs and health care expenses — Order for payment of health care coverage — Noncustodial parent’s health plan — Attachment of income — Credit for disability payments.

An action to establish or enforce child support may be initiated by the parent, custodian, or agency substantially contributing to the support of the child. The action may be brought in the county in which the child resides or where the defendant resides.

At the time of initial establishment of a child support order, whether temporary or permanent, or in any proceeding to modify a support order, the child support guidelines in KRS

403.212

or

403.2121

shall serve as a rebuttable presumption for the establishment or modification of the amount of child support. Courts may deviate from the guidelines where their application would be unjust or inappropriate. Any deviation shall be accompanied by a written finding or specific finding on the record by the court, specifying the reason for the deviation.

A written finding or specific finding on the record that the application of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case shall be sufficient to rebut the presumption and allow for an appropriate adjustment of the guideline award if based upon one (1) or more of the following criteria:

A child’s extraordinary medical or dental needs;

A child’s extraordinary educational, job training, or special needs;

Either parent’s own extraordinary needs, such as medical expenses;

The independent financial resources, if any, of the child or children;

Combined monthly adjusted parental gross income in excess of the Kentucky child support guidelines;

The parents of the child, having demonstrated knowledge of the amount of child support established by the Kentucky child support guidelines, have agreed to child support different from the guideline amount. However, no such agreement shall be the basis of any deviation if public assistance is being paid on behalf of a child under the provisions of Part D of Title IV of the Federal Social Security Act; and

Any similar factor of an extraordinary nature specifically identified by the court which would make application of the guidelines inappropriate.

“Extraordinary” as used in this section shall be determined by the court in its discretion.

When a party has defaulted or the court is otherwise presented with insufficient evidence to determine gross income, the court shall order child support based upon the needs of the child or the previous standard of living of the child, whichever is greater. An order entered by default or due to insufficient evidence to determine gross income may be modified upward and arrearages awarded from the date of the original order if evidence of gross income is presented within two (2) years which would have established a higher amount of child support pursuant to the child support guidelines set forth in KRS

403.212

or

403.2121

.

The court shall allocate between the parents, in proportion to their combined monthly adjusted parental gross income, reasonable and necessary child care costs incurred due to employment, job search, or education leading to employment, in addition to the amount ordered under the child support guidelines.

Pursuant to 45 C.F.R. sec. 303.31(a)(2), for the purposes of this section, “health care coverage” includes fee for service, health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, and other types of private health insurance and public health care coverage under which medical services could be provided to a dependent child. If health care coverage is reasonable in cost and accessible to either parent at the time the request for coverage is made, the court shall order the parent to obtain or maintain coverage, and the court shall allocate between the parents, in proportion to their combined monthly adjusted parental gross income, the cost of health care coverage for the child, in addition to the support ordered under the child support guidelines.

A parent, who has one hundred percent (100%) of the combined monthly adjusted parental gross income, shall be entitled to a reduction in gross income of the entire amount of premiums incurred and paid.

The court shall order the cost of health care coverage of the child to be paid by either or both parents of the child regardless of who has physical custody. The court order shall include:

A judicial directive designating which parent shall have financial responsibility for providing health care coverage for the dependent child, which shall include but not be limited to health care coverage, payments of necessary health care deductibles or copayments;

If appropriate, cash medical support. “Cash medical support” means an amount to be paid toward the cost of health care coverage, fixed payments for ongoing medical costs, extraordinary medical expenses, or any combination thereof; and

A statement providing that if the designated parent’s health care coverage provides for covered services for dependent children beyond the age of majority, then any unmarried children up to twenty-five (25) years of age who are full-time students enrolled in and attending an accredited educational institution and who are primarily dependent on the insured parent for maintenance and support shall be covered.

If health care coverage is not reasonable in cost and accessible at the time the request for the coverage is made, the court order shall provide for cash medical support until health care coverage becomes reasonable in cost and accessible.

For purposes of this section, “reasonable in cost” means that the cost of coverage to the responsible parent does not exceed five percent (5%) of his or her gross income. The five percent (5%) standard shall apply to the cost of adding the child to an existing policy, the difference in the cost between a single and a family policy, or the cost of acquiring a separate policy to cover the child. If the parties agree or the court finds good cause exists, the court may order health care coverage in excess of five percent (5%) of the parent’s gross income.

For purposes of this section, “accessible” means that there are providers who meet the health care needs of the child and who are located no more than sixty (60) minutes or sixty (60) miles from the child’s primary residence, except that nothing shall prohibit use of a provider located more than sixty (60) minutes or sixty (60) miles from the child’s primary residence.

The cost of extraordinary medical expenses shall be allocated between the parties in proportion to their combined monthly adjusted parental gross incomes. “Extraordinary medical expenses” means uninsured expenses in excess of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per child per calendar year. “Extraordinary medical expenses” includes but is not limited to the costs that are reasonably necessary for medical, surgical, dental, orthodontal, optometric, nursing, and hospital services; for professional counseling or psychiatric therapy for diagnosed medical disorders; and for drugs and medical supplies, appliances, laboratory, diagnostic, and therapeutic services.

The court order shall include the Social Security numbers, provided in accordance with KRS

403.135

, of all parties subject to a support order.

In any case administered by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, if the parent ordered to provide health care coverage is enrolled through an insurer but fails to enroll the child under family coverage, the other parent or the Cabinet for Health and Family Services may, upon application, enroll the child.

In any case administered by the cabinet, information received or transmitted shall not be published or be open for public inspection, including reasonable evidence of domestic violence or child abuse if the disclosure of the information could be harmful to the custodial parent or the child of the parent. Necessary information and records may be furnished as specified by KRS

205.175

.

In the case in which a parent is obligated to provide health care coverage, and changes employment, and the new employer provides health care coverage, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall transfer notice of the provision for coverage for the child to the employer, which shall operate to enroll this child in the obligated parent’s health plan, unless the obligated parent contests the notice as specified by KRS Chapter 13B.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any wage or income shall not be exempt from attachment or assignment for the payment of current child support or owed or to-be-owed child support.

A payment of money received by a child as a result of a parental disability shall be credited against the child support obligation of the parent. A payment shall not be counted as income to either parent when calculating a child support obligation. An amount received in excess of the child support obligation shall be credited against a child support arrearage owed by the parent that accrued subsequent to the date of the parental disability, but shall not be applied to an arrearage that accrued prior to the date of disability. The date of disability shall be as determined by the paying agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 418, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 330, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 328, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 255, § 19, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 579, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 430, § 18, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 624, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 126, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 82, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2018 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 47, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 122, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.